Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Article III Regulation of Manufacturing, Distributing, Prescribing, Administering, and Dispensing Controlled Substances

21-28-3.01.
Rules and regulations — Fees.

The director of health is authorized, empowered, and directed to make any rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this chapter and to provide any fees for licenses, registrations, and forms that he or she may deem proper to promote the enforcement of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.02.
Registration requirements.

Every person who manufactures, distributes, prescribes, administers, or dispenses any controlled substance within this state, or who proposes to engage in the manufacture, distribution, prescribing, administering, or dispensing of any controlled substance within this state, must obtain annually a registration issued by the director of health in accordance with his or her rules.

Persons registered by the director of health under this chapter to manufacture, distribute, prescribe, administer, dispense, or conduct research with those substances may do so to the extent authorized by their registration and in conformity with the other provisions of this chapter.

As a condition of the initial registration or renewal of the practitioner’s authority to prescribe controlled substances, all such practitioners shall be automatically registered with the prescription-drug-monitoring database maintained by the department of health.

By January 1, 2017, the director of health shall develop regulations for appropriate training in best prescribing practices needed for license renewal.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 199, § 1.

21-28-3.03.
Registration.

The director of health shall register an applicant to manufacture, distribute, prescribe, administer, or dispense controlled substances unless he or she determines that the issuance of that registration would be inconsistent with the public interest. In determining the public interest, the director of health may consider, but shall not be limited to, the following factors:

Maintenance of effective controls against diversion of controlled substances into other than legitimate medical, scientific, or industrial channels;

Compliance with applicable federal, state, and local law;

Conviction of a crime or plea of nolo contendere by the applicant of any state or federal law involving the sale of, trafficking in, or abuse of a controlled substance;

Past experience in the manufacture, distribution, prescribing, administration, or dispensing of controlled substances, and the existence in the applicant’s establishment of effective controls against diversion;

Furnishing by the applicant of false or fraudulent material in any application filed under this chapter;

Suspension or revocation of the applicant’s federal registration to manufacture, distribute, prescribe, administer, or dispense controlled substances as authorized by federal law.

Registration under subsection (a) of this section does not entitle a registrant to manufacture and distribute controlled substances in schedule I or II other than those specified in his or her registration.

Practitioners must be registered in accordance with subsection (a) of this section to prescribe, administer, and dispense any controlled substance or to conduct research with controlled substances in schedules II through V. The director of health need not require separate registration under this section for practitioners engaging in research with non-narcotic controlled substances in schedules II through V where the registrant is already registered under this chapter in another capacity. Practitioners registered under federal law to conduct research with schedule I substances may conduct research with schedule I substances within this state upon furnishing the director of health evidence of that federal registration.

Compliance by manufacturers and distributors with the provisions of the federal law respecting registration (excluding fees) entitles them to be registered under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 257, § 1.

21-28-3.04.
Suspension or revocation of registration.

A registration to manufacture, distribute, prescribe, administer, or dispense a controlled substance may be suspended or revoked by the director of health upon a finding that the continuance of that registration would be inconsistent with the public interest. In considering the public interest, the director of health may consider, but shall not be limited to, the following factors:

Maintenance of effective controls against diversion of controlled substances into other than legitimate medical, scientific, or industrial channels;

The registrant is not in compliance with applicable federal, state, or local law;

The registrant has been convicted of a crime or has pleaded nolo contendere to a violation of any state or federal law;

The registrant or registrant’s establishment lacks or cannot establish or maintain effective controls to guard against diversion of controlled substances;

That the applicant or registrant has furnished false or fraudulent material information in any application filed under this chapter;

That the registrant has had his or her federal registration to manufacture, distribute, prescribe, administer, or dispense controlled substances suspended or revoked;

Abuse or excessive use of controlled substances by the registrant; or

Possessing, using, prescribing, dispensing, or administering controlled substances except for a legitimate medical or scientific purpose.

The director of health may limit revocation or suspension of a registration to the particular controlled substance with respect to which grounds for revocation or suspension exist.

If the director of health suspends or revokes a registration, all controlled substances owned or possessed by the registrant at the time of suspension or the effective date of the revocation order may be placed under embargo. No disposition may be made of substances under embargo until the time for taking an appeal has elapsed or until all appeals have been concluded unless a court, upon application for the court order, orders the sale of perishable substances and the deposit of the proceeds of the sale with the court. Upon a revocation order becoming final, all controlled substances or the proceeds of the sale of the controlled substances shall be forfeited to the state.

The director of health shall promptly notify the Drug Enforcement Administration of all orders or revoking registration and all forfeitures of controlled substances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 257, § 1.

21-28-3.05.
Order to show cause.

Before denying, suspending, or revoking a registration, or refusing a renewal of a registration, the director of health shall serve upon the applicant or registrant an order to show cause why the registration should not be denied, revoked, or suspended, or why the renewal should not be refused. The order to show cause shall contain a statement of the basis of the order and shall call upon the applicant or registrant to appear before the director of health at a time and place stated in the order but in no event less than thirty (30) days after the date of receipt of the order. Proceedings to deny, suspend, or revoke shall be conducted pursuant to this section in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42, the Administrative Procedures Act. The proceedings shall be independent of, and not in lieu of, criminal prosecution or other proceedings under this chapter or any law of the state.

The director of health may suspend for a period of ten (10) days any registration simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under this section in cases where he or she finds that there is an imminent danger to the public health or safety. The suspension shall continue in effect until the conclusion of the proceedings, including judicial review of them, unless sooner withdrawn by the director of health or dissolved by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54.

21-28-3.06.
License required for manufacture.

No person shall manufacture, compound, mix, cultivate, grow, or by any other process produce or prepare controlled substances, and no person as a wholesaler shall supply controlled substances, without first having obtained a license to do so from the director of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.07.
Qualifications for licensees.

No license shall be issued under §

21-28-3.06

unless and until the applicant for the license has furnished proof satisfactory to the department:

That the applicant is of good moral character or, if the applicant is an association or corporation, that the managing officers are of good moral character.

That the applicant is equipped as to land, buildings, and paraphernalia to properly carry on the business prescribed in his or her application.

That the applicant maintains effective controls against diversion of controlled substances into other than legitimate channels.

No license shall be granted to any person who has within five (5) years been convicted of a willful violation of any law of the United States or of any state relating to controlled substances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.08.
Disposition of license fees.

All fees for licenses and registrations under this chapter shall be turned over to the general treasurer for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.09.
Denial, revocation, or suspension of licenses.

A license to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance, may be suspended or revoked by the director of health upon finding that the licensee:

Has materially falsified any application filed pursuant to this chapter or required by this chapter;

Has been convicted of any violation of the provisions of this chapter or any law of the United States or of any state relating to any substances defined in this chapter as a controlled substance;

Has had his or her federal registration suspended or revoked by competent federal law to engage in the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of controlled substances; or

Has violated any provisions of this chapter.

The director of health may limit revocation or suspension of a license to a particular controlled substance with respect to which grounds for revocation or suspension exist.

Before taking action pursuant to this section or pursuant to a denial of license under this section, the director of health shall serve upon the applicant or licensee an order to show cause why license should not be denied, revoked, or suspended. The order to show cause shall contain a statement of the basis of the order and shall call upon the applicant or licensee to appear before the director of health at a time and place stated in the order but in no event less than thirty (30) days after the date of receipt of the order. Proceedings to deny, revoke, or suspend shall be conducted pursuant to this section in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42, the Administrative Procedures Act. The proceedings shall be independent of, and not in lieu of, criminal prosecutions or other proceedings under this chapter or any law of the state.

The director of health may suspend for a period of ten (10) days any license simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under this section in cases where he or she finds that there is an imminent danger to the public safety or health. The suspension shall continue in effect until the conclusion of the proceedings, including judicial review of them, unless sooner withdrawn by the director of health or dissolved by a court of competent jurisdiction.

In the event the director of health suspends or revokes a license granted under this chapter, all controlled substances owned or possessed by the licensee pursuant to the licensure at the time of suspension or the effective date of the revocation order, as the case may be, may be placed under embargo by the director of health. No disposition may be made of substances under embargo until the time for taking an appeal has elapsed or until all appeals have been concluded unless a court, upon application for the court order, orders the sale of perishable substances and the deposit of the proceeds of the sale with the court. Upon revocation order becoming final, all controlled substances shall be forfeited to the director of health for destruction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.10.
Authorized sales by manufacturers and wholesalers on official written orders.

A duly licensed manufacturer or wholesaler may sell and distribute controlled substances on official written orders to any of the following persons:

To a manufacturer or wholesaler;

To a practitioner;

To a person in charge of a hospital, but only for use by or in that hospital;

To a person in charge of a laboratory, but only for use by or in that laboratory;

To any other person lawfully permitted to possess controlled substances under federal law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.11.
Form, delivery, and preservation of official written orders.

An official written order for any controlled substance shall be signed in duplicate by the person giving the order or by his or her duly authorized agent. The original shall be presented to the person who sells or distributes the controlled substances named in it. In the event of the acceptance of the order by that person, each party to the transaction shall preserve his or her copy of the order for a period of two (2) years in such a way as to be readily accessible for inspection by any public officer or employee engaged in the enforcement of this chapter. It shall be deemed a compliance with this section if the parties to the transaction have complied with the federal law respecting the requirements governing the use of order forms.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the person giving the order, or his or her duly authorized agent, from presenting said order to the person who sells or distributes the controlled substances named in it by use of facsimile transmission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 481, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 532, § 1.

21-28-3.12.
Records of controlled substances used in professional practice.

Every practitioner or other person who is authorized to administer or professionally use controlled substances shall keep a record of controlled substances received by him or her, and a record of all controlled substances administered, dispensed, or professionally used by him or her; other than by prescription.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.13.
Records of manufacturers and wholesalers.

Manufacturers and wholesalers shall keep records of all controlled substances compounded, mixed, cultivated, grown, or by any other process produced or prepared, and of all controlled substances received and disposed of by them in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.14.
Records of apothecaries.

Apothecaries shall keep records of all controlled substances received and disposed of by them, as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.15.
Records of vendors of schedule V substances.

Every person who purchases for resale, or who sells controlled substances listed in schedule V excepted by this chapter, shall keep a record showing the quantities and kinds of controlled substances received and sold, or disposed of otherwise, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.16.
Form, content, and preservation of records.

The form of records and who shall keep the records shall be prescribed by the director of health. The records of controlled substances received shall in every case show the date of receipt, the name and address of the person from whom received, and the kind and quantity of controlled substances received.

A manufacturer shall maintain on a current basis a complete and accurate record of all controlled substances manufactured, sold, delivered, or otherwise disposed of by him or her. The records shall be reported to the director of health monthly.

A wholesaler shall maintain on a current basis a complete and accurate record of all controlled substances sold, delivered, or disposed of by him or her. The records shall be reported to the director of health monthly.

All persons authorized to handle controlled substances under this chapter shall immediately report to the director of health all controlled substances lost, destroyed, or stolen, and the kind and quantity of the controlled substances and the date of the discovery of the loss, destruction or theft.

The record of all controlled substances sold, administered, dispensed, or disposed of shall show the date of selling, administering, or dispensing, the name and address of the person to whom, or for whose use, or the owner and species of animal for which the drugs were sold, administered, or dispensed, and the kind and quantity of the controlled substance. Every record shall be kept for a period of two (2) years from the date of the transaction recorded. The keeping of a record required by or under the federal law, containing substantially the same information as is specified in this section, shall constitute compliance with this section. All persons authorized to handle controlled substances shall conduct a biannual inventory of all controlled substances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.17.
Records open to inspection.

All records required to be kept under the provisions of this chapter shall at all times be open to inspection by the director of health and by the authorized agents of the director of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.

21-28-3.18.
Prescriptions.

An apothecary in good faith may sell and dispense controlled substances in schedules II, III, IV, and V to any person upon a valid prescription by a practitioner licensed by law to prescribe or administer those substances; dated and signed by the person prescribing on the day when issued and bearing the full name and address of the patient to whom, or of the owner of the animal for which, the substance is dispensed; and the full name, address, and registration number under the federal law of the person prescribing, if he or she is required by that law to be registered. If the prescription is for an animal, it shall state the species of the animal for which the substance is prescribed.

When filling a hard-copy prescription for a schedule II controlled substance, the apothecary filling the prescription shall sign his or her full name and shall write the date of filling on the face of the prescription.

The prescription shall be retained on file by the proprietor of the pharmacy in which it was filled for a period of two (2) years so as to be readily accessible for inspection by any public officer or employee engaged in the enforcement of this chapter.

Hard-copy prescriptions for controlled substances in schedule II shall be filed separately and shall not be refilled.

The director of health shall, after appropriate notice and hearing pursuant to §

42-35-3

, promulgate rules and regulations for the purpose of adopting a system for electronic data transmission of prescriptions for controlled substances in schedules II, III, IV, and V. Opioid antagonists, including, but not limited to, naloxone, as may be further determined by rules and regulations, shall be transmitted with controlled substances in schedules II, III, IV, and V. Provided, information collected regarding dispensing of opioid antagonists shall be for statistical, research, or educational purposes only. The department’s rules and regulations shall require the removal of patient, recipient, or prescriber information that could be used to identify individual patients or recipients of opioid antagonists.

A practitioner shall sign and transmit electronic prescriptions for controlled substances in schedules II, III, IV, and V to a pharmacy in accordance with rules and regulations as shall be promulgated by the department and which shall require electronic transmission no sooner than January 1, 2020, and a pharmacy may dispense an electronically transmitted prescription for these controlled substances in accordance with the code of federal regulations, 21 C.F.R., pt. 1300, et seq.

Subject to the rules and regulations promulgated by the department pursuant to subsection (d)(3) of this section, a prescription for a schedule II narcotic substance to be compounded for the direct administration to a patient by parenteral, intravenous, intramuscular, subcutaneous, or intraspinal infusion may be transmitted by the practitioner, or practitioner’s agent, to the pharmacy by facsimile. The facsimile will serve as the original prescription.

Subject to the rules and regulations promulgated by the department pursuant to subsection (d)(3) of this section, a prescription for a schedule II substance for a resident of a long-term-care facility may be transmitted by the practitioner, or the practitioner’s agent, to the dispensing pharmacy by facsimile. The facsimile serves as the original prescription.

Subject to the rules and regulations promulgated by the department pursuant to subsection (d)(3) of this section, a prescription for a schedule II narcotic substance for a patient residing in a hospice certified by Medicare under title XVIII of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq., or licensed by the state, may be transmitted by the practitioner, or practitioner’s agent, to the dispensing pharmacy by facsimile. The practitioner, or the practitioner’s agent, will note on the prescription that the patient is a hospice patient. The facsimile serves as the original, written prescription.

An apothecary, in lieu of a written prescription, may sell and dispense controlled substances in schedules III, IV, and V to any person upon an oral prescription of a practitioner. In issuing an oral prescription, the prescriber shall furnish the apothecary with the same information as is required by subsection (a) of this section and the apothecary who fills the prescription shall immediately reduce the oral prescription to writing and shall inscribe the information on the written record of the prescription made. This record shall be filed and preserved by the proprietor of the pharmacy in which it is filled in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section. In no case may a prescription for a controlled substance listed in schedules III, IV, or V be filled or refilled more than six (6) months after the date on which the prescription was issued and no prescription shall be authorized to be refilled more than five (5) times. Each refilling shall be entered on the face or back of the prescription and note the date and amount of controlled substance dispensed and the initials or identity of the dispensing apothecary.

In the case of an emergency situation as defined in federal law, an apothecary may dispense a controlled substance listed in schedule II upon receiving an oral authorization of a prescribing practitioner provided that:

The quantity prescribed and dispensed is limited to the amount adequate to treat the patient during the emergency period and dispensing beyond the emergency period must be pursuant to a written prescription signed by the prescribing practitioner.

The prescription shall be immediately reduced to writing and shall contain all the information required in subsection (a).

The prescription must be dispensed in good faith in the normal course of professional practice.

Within seven (7) days after authorizing an emergency oral prescription, the prescribing practitioner shall cause a prescription for the emergency quantity prescribed to be delivered to the dispensing apothecary. The prescription shall have written on its face “authorization for emergency dispensing” and the date of the oral order. The prescription, upon receipt by the apothecary, shall be attached to the oral emergency prescription that had earlier been reduced to writing.

The partial filling of a prescription for a controlled substance listed in schedule II is permissible, if the apothecary is unable to supply the full quantity called for in a prescription or emergency oral prescription and he or she makes a notation of the quantity supplied on the face of the prescription or oral emergency prescription that has been reduced to writing. The remaining portion of the prescription may be filled within seventy-two (72) hours of the first partial filling, however, if the remaining portion is not, or cannot be, filled within seventy-two (72) hours, the apothecary shall notify the prescribing practitioner. No further quantity may be supplied beyond seventy-two (72) hours without a new prescription.

A prescription for a schedule II controlled substance written for a patient in a long-term-care facility (LTCF), or for a patient with a medical diagnosis documenting a terminal illness, may be filled in partial quantities to include individual dosage units. If there is a question whether a patient may be classified as having a terminal illness, the pharmacist must contact the practitioner prior to partially filling the prescription. Both the pharmacist and the prescribing practitioner have a corresponding responsibility to assure that the controlled substance is for a terminally ill patient.

The pharmacist must record on the prescription whether the patient is “terminally ill” or an “LTCF patient.” A prescription that is partially filled, and does not contain the notation “terminally ill” or “LTCF patient,” shall be deemed to have been filled in violation of this chapter.

For each partial filling, the dispensing pharmacist shall record on the back of the prescription (or on another appropriate record, uniformly maintained, and readily retrievable), the:

Date of the partial filling;

Quantity dispensed;

Remaining quantity authorized to be dispensed; and

Identification of the dispensing pharmacist.

The total quantity of schedule II controlled substances dispensed in all partial fillings must not exceed the total quantity prescribed.

Schedule II prescriptions for patients in a LTCF, or patients with a medical diagnosis documenting a terminal illness, are valid for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days from the issue date, unless sooner terminated by the discontinuance of medication.

Automated data-processing systems. As an alternative to the prescription record-keeping provision of subsection (h) of this section, an automated data-processing system may be employed for the record-keeping system if the following conditions have been met:

The system shall have the capability of producing sight-readable documents of all original and refilled prescription information. The term “sight readable” means that an authorized agent shall be able to examine the record and read the information. During the course of an on-site inspection, the record may be read from the CRT, microfiche, microfilm, printout, or other method acceptable to the director. In the case of administrative proceedings, records must be provided in a paper printout form.

The information shall include, but not be limited to, the prescription requirements and records of dispensing as indicated in subsection (h) of this section.

The individual pharmacist responsible for completeness and accuracy of the entries to the system must provide documentation of the fact that prescription information entered into the computer is correct. In documenting this information, the pharmacy shall have the option to either:

Maintain a bound logbook, or separate file, in which each individual pharmacist involved in the dispensing shall sign a statement each day attesting to the fact that the prescription information entered into the computer that day has been reviewed and is correct as shown. The book or file must be maintained at the pharmacy employing that system for a period of at least two (2) years after the date of last dispensing; or

Provide a printout of each day’s prescription information. That printout shall be verified, dated, and signed by the individual pharmacist verifying that the information indicated is correct. The printout must be maintained at least two (2) years from the date of last dispensing.

An auxiliary, record-keeping system shall be established for the documentation of refills if the automated data-processing system is inoperative for any reason. The auxiliary system shall ensure that all refills are authorized by the original prescription and that the maximum number of refills is not exceeded. When this automated data-processing system is restored to operation, the information regarding prescriptions filled and refilled during the inoperative period shall be entered into the automated data-processing system within ninety-six (96) hours.

Any pharmacy using an automated data-processing system must comply with all applicable state and federal laws and regulations.

A pharmacy shall make arrangements with the supplier of data-processing services or materials to ensure that the pharmacy continues to have adequate and complete prescription and dispensing records if the relationship with the supplier terminates for any reason. A pharmacy shall ensure continuity in the maintenance of records.

The automated data-processing system shall contain adequate safeguards for security of the records to maintain the confidentiality and accuracy of the prescription information. Safeguards against unauthorized changes in data after the information has been entered and verified by the registered pharmacist shall be provided by the system.

Prescriptions for controlled substances as found in schedule II will become void unless dispensed within ninety (90) days of the original date of the prescription and in no event shall more than a thirty-day (30) supply be dispensed at any one time.

In prescribing controlled substances in schedule II, practitioners may write up to three (3) separate prescriptions, each for up to a one-month supply, each signed and dated on the date written. For those prescriptions for the second and/or third month, the practitioner must write the earliest date each of those subsequent prescriptions may be filled, with directions to the pharmacist to fill no earlier than the date specified on the face of the prescription.

The prescriptions in schedules III, IV, and V will become void unless dispensed within one hundred eighty (180) days of the original date of the prescription. For purposes of this section, a “dosage unit” shall be defined as a single capsule, tablet, or suppository, or not more than one five (5) ml. of an oral liquid.

Prescriptions in schedule III cannot be written for more than one hundred (100) dosage units and not more than one hundred (100) dosage units may be dispensed at one time. Provided, however, manufacturer prepackaged steroids and hormones in schedule III shall be exempt from this subsection.

Prescriptions in schedules IV and V may be written for up to a ninety-day (90) supply based on directions. No more than three hundred and sixty (360) dosage units may be dispensed at one time.

A pharmacy shall transmit prescription information to the prescription-monitoring database at the department of health within one business day following the dispensing of an opioid prescription.

The pharmacist shall inform patients verbally or in writing about the proper disposal of expired, unused, or unwanted medications, including the location of local disposal sites as listed on the department of health website.

The pharmacist shall inform patients verbally or in writing in the proper use of any devices necessary for the administration of controlled substances.

A healthcare professional authorized to issue prescriptions shall, prior to issuing an initial prescription for an opioid drug, specifically discuss with the patient who is eighteen (18) years of age or older, or the patient’s parent or guardian if the patient is under eighteen (18) years of age, the risks of developing a dependence or addiction to the prescription opioid drug and potential of overdose or death; the adverse risks of concurrent use of alcohol or other psychoactive medications and the patient’s or the minor patient’s parent or guardian’s responsibility to safeguard all medications; and, if the prescriber deems it appropriate, discuss such alternative treatments as may be available. For patients in recovery from substance dependence, education shall be focused on relapse risk factors. This discussion shall be noted in the patient’s record.

The director of the department of health shall develop and make available to prescribers guidelines for the discussion required pursuant to this subsection.

The discussion required under this subsection shall not be required prior to issuing a prescription to any patient who is currently receiving hospice care from a licensed hospice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 474, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 335, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 28, § 5; P.L. 1999, ch. 91, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 54; P.L. 2003, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 481, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 532, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 195, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 250, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 59, § 1.

21-28-3.19.
Sale of stock on discontinuance of pharmacy business.

The legal owner of any stock of controlled substances in a pharmacy, upon discontinuance of dealing in the controlled substances, may sell the stock to a manufacturer, wholesaler, or apothecary, but only on an official written order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 183, § 2.